Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1599.01
Acceptance of applications for licensure; limitation.

The department shall not accept any applications for licensure as provided in section 81-15,101 prior to October 1, 1989.

Laws 1988, LB 1092, § 13.